Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202487-303.13
Trial by jury.

The Attorney General or defendant may demand that any claim under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act be tried by a jury.

Laws 2024, LB934, § 7.
April 16, 2024